Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin 2023 AID PENALTY FORGIVENESS; CITY OF STEWART.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 477A.017, subdivision 3, the city of Stewart must receive its aid payment for calendar year 2023 under Minnesota Statutes, section 477A.013, that was withheld under Minnesota Statutes, section 477A.017, subdivision 3, provided that the state auditor certifies to the commissioner of revenue that the state auditor received the annual financial reporting form for 2022 from the city by June 1, 2025. The commissioner of revenue must make a payment of $87,501.50 to the city of Stewart by June 30, 2025. An amount sufficient to pay aid under this section is appropriated in fiscal year 2025 from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end